Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Organization, Administration and Operation

§ 43-21-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Youth Court Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-103.
Construction and purpose.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that each child coming within the jurisdiction of the youth court shall become a responsible, accountable and productive citizen, and that each such child shall receive such care, guidance and control, preferably in such child’s own home as is conducive toward that end and is in the state’s and the child’s best interest. It is the public policy of this state that the parents of each child shall be primarily responsible for the care, support, education and welfare of such children; however, when it is necessary that a child be removed from the control of such child’s parents, the youth court shall secure proper care for such child.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-21-105.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, for purposes of this chapter, shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly otherwise requires:

“Youth court” means the Youth Court Division.

“Judge” means the judge of the Youth Court Division.

“Designee” means any person that the judge appoints to perform a duty which this chapter requires to be done by the judge or his designee. The judge may not appoint a person who is involved in law enforcement or who is an employee of the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services to be his designee.

“Child” and “youth” are synonymous, and each means a person who has not reached his eighteenth birthday. A child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday and is on active duty for a branch of the armed services or is married is not considered a “child” or “youth” for the purposes of this chapter.

“Parent” means the father or mother to whom the child has been born, or the father or mother by whom the child has been legally adopted.

“Guardian” means a court-appointed guardian of the person of a child.

“Custodian” means any person having the present care or custody of a child whether such person be a parent or otherwise.

“Legal custodian” means a court-appointed custodian of the child.

“Delinquent child” means a child who has reached his tenth birthday and who has committed a delinquent act.

“Delinquent act” is any act, which if committed by an adult, is designated as a crime under state or federal law, or municipal or county ordinance other than offenses punishable by life imprisonment or death. A delinquent act includes escape from lawful detention and violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law and violent behavior.

“Child in need of supervision” means a child who has reached his seventh birthday and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation because the child:

Is habitually disobedient of reasonable and lawful commands of his parent, guardian or custodian and is ungovernable; or

While being required to attend school, willfully and habitually violates the rules thereof or willfully and habitually absents himself therefrom; or

Runs away from home without good cause; or

Has committed a delinquent act or acts.

“Neglected child” means a child:

Whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, neglects or refuses, when able so to do, to provide for him proper and necessary care or support, or education as required by law, or medical, surgical, or other care necessary for his well-being; however, a parent who withholds medical treatment from any child who in good faith is under treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof shall not, for that reason alone, be considered to be neglectful under any provision of this chapter; or

Who is otherwise without proper care, custody, supervision or support; or

Who, for any reason, lacks the special care made necessary for him by reason of his mental condition, whether the mental condition is having mental illness or having an intellectual disability; or

Who, for any reason, lacks the care necessary for his health, morals or well-being.

“Abused child” means a child whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, whether legally obligated to do so or not, has caused or allowed to be caused, upon the child, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, commercial sexual exploitation, emotional abuse, mental injury, nonaccidental physical injury or other maltreatment. However, physical discipline, including spanking, performed on a child by a parent, guardian or custodian in a reasonable manner shall not be deemed abuse under this section. “Abused child” also means a child who is or has been trafficked within the meaning of the Mississippi Human Trafficking Act by any person, without regard to the relationship of the person to the child.

“Sexual abuse” means obscene or pornographic photographing, filming or depiction of children for commercial purposes, or the rape, molestation, incest, prostitution or other such forms of sexual exploitation of children under circumstances which indicate that the child’s health or welfare is harmed or threatened.

“A child in need of special care” means a child with any mental or physical illness that cannot be treated with the dispositional alternatives ordinarily available to the youth court.

A “dependent child” means any child who is not a child in need of supervision, a delinquent child, an abused child or a neglected child, and which child has been voluntarily placed in the custody of the Department of Child Protection Services by his parent, guardian or custodian.

“Custody” means the physical possession of the child by any person.

“Legal custody” means the legal status created by a court order which gives the legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care, all subject to residual rights and responsibilities of the parent or guardian of the person.

“Detention” means the care of children in physically restrictive facilities.

“Shelter” means care of children in physically nonrestrictive facilities.

“Records involving children” means any of the following from which the child can be identified:

All youth court records as defined in Section 43-21-251;

All forensic interviews conducted by a child advocacy center in abuse and neglect investigations;

All law enforcement records as defined in Section 43-21-255;

All agency records as defined in Section 43-21-257; and

All other documents maintained by any representative of the state, county, municipality or other public agency insofar as they relate to the apprehension, custody, adjudication or disposition of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause.

“Any person responsible for care or support” means the person who is providing for the child at a given time. This term shall include, but is not limited to, stepparents, foster parents, relatives, nonlicensed babysitters or other similar persons responsible for a child and staff of residential care facilities and group homes that are licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services.

The singular includes the plural, the plural the singular and the masculine the feminine when consistent with the intent of this chapter.

“Out-of-home” setting means the temporary supervision or care of children by the staff of licensed day care centers, the staff of public, private and state schools, the staff of juvenile detention facilities, the staff of unlicensed residential care facilities and group homes and the staff of, or individuals representing, churches, civic or social organizations.

“Durable legal custody” means the legal status created by a court order which gives the durable legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with care, nurture, welfare, food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care. All these duties as enumerated are subject to the residual rights and responsibilities of the natural parent(s) or guardian(s) of the child or children.

“Status offense” means conduct subject to adjudication by the youth court that would not be a crime if committed by an adult.

“Financially able” means a parent or child who is ineligible for a court-appointed attorney.

“Assessment” means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child’s psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders and recommendations for treatment. The term includes, but is not limited to, a drug and alcohol, psychological or psychiatric evaluation, records review, clinical interview or the administration of a formal test and instrument.

“Screening” means a process, with or without the administration of a formal instrument, that is designed to identify a child who is at increased risk of having mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention or more comprehensive assessment.

“Durable legal relative guardianship” means the legal status created by a youth court order that conveys the physical and legal custody of a child or children by durable legal guardianship to a relative or fictive kin who is licensed as a foster or resource parent.

“Relative” means a person related to the child by affinity or consanguinity within the third degree.

“Fictive kin” means a person not related to the child legally or biologically but who is considered a relative due to a significant, familial-like and ongoing relationship with the child and family.

“Reasonable efforts” means the exercise of reasonable care and due diligence by the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other appropriate entity or person to use appropriate and available services to prevent the unnecessary removal of the child from the home or provide other services related to meeting the needs of the child and the parents.

“Commercial sexual exploitation” means any sexual act or crime of a sexual nature, which is committed against a child for financial or economic gain, to obtain a thing of value for quid pro quo exchange of property or for any other purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 539, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 17; Laws, 1996, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 73; Laws, 2013, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 12; Laws, 2017, ch. 427, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 420, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-107.
Establishment clause.

A youth court division is hereby created as a division of the county court of each county now or hereafter having a county court, and the county judge shall be the judge of the youth court unless another judge is named by the county judge as provided by this chapter.

A youth court division is hereby created as a division of the chancery court of each county in which no county court is maintained and any chancellor within a chancery court district shall be the judge of the youth court of that county within such chancery court district unless another judge is named by the senior chancellor of the county or chancery court district as provided by this chapter.

In any county where there is no county court or family court on July 1, 1979, there may be created a youth court division as a division of the municipal court in any city if the governing authorities of such city adopt a resolution to that effect. The cost of the youth court division of the municipal court shall be paid from any funds available to the municipality excluding county funds. No additional municipal youth court shall be formed after January 1, 2007.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 4; Laws, 1982, ch. 476, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 334; Laws, 2007, ch. 557, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 43-21-109.
Youth court facilities.

Any county or municipality may separately or jointly establish and maintain detention facilities, shelter facilities, foster homes, or any other facility necessary to carry on the work of the youth court. For said purposes, the county or municipality may acquire necessary land by condemnation, by purchase or donation, may issue bonds as now provided by law for the purpose of purchasing, constructing, remodeling or maintaining such facilities; may expend necessary funds from the general fund to construct and maintain such facilities, and may employ architects to design or remodel such facilities. Such facilities may include a place for housing youth court facilities and personnel.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 43-21-111.
Referee.

In any county not having a county court or family court the judge may appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 regular or special referees who shall be attorneys at law and members of the bar in good standing to act in cases concerning children within the jurisdiction of the youth court, and a regular referee shall hold office until removed by the judge. The requirement that regular or special referees appointed pursuant to this subsection be attorneys shall apply only to regular or special referees who were not first appointed regular or special referees prior to July 1, 1991.

Any referee appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be required to receive judicial training approved by the Mississippi Judicial College and shall be required to receive regular annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice. The amount of judicial training and annual continuing education which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this section shall conform with the amount prescribed by the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court. The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of referees appointed under this section, shall enforce the provisions of this subsection and shall maintain records on all such referees regarding such training. Should a referee miss two (2) consecutive training sessions sponsored or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College as required by this subsection or fail to attend one (1) such training session within six (6) months of their initial appointment as a referee, the referee shall be disqualified to serve and be immediately removed as a referee and another member of the bar shall be appointed as provided in this section.

The judge may direct that hearings in any case or class of cases be conducted in the first instance by the referee. The judge may also delegate his own administrative responsibilities to the referee.

All hearings authorized to be heard by a referee shall proceed in the same manner as hearings before the youth court judge. A referee shall possess all powers and perform all the duties of the youth court judge in the hearings authorized to be heard by the referee.

An order entered by the referee shall be mailed immediately to all parties and their counsel. A rehearing by the judge shall be allowed if any party files a written motion for a rehearing or on the court’s own motion within three (3) days after notice of referee’s order. The youth court may enlarge the time for filing a motion for a rehearing for good cause shown. Any rehearing shall be upon the record of the hearing before the referee, but additional evidence may be admitted in the discretion of the judge. A motion for a rehearing shall not act as a supersedeas of the referee’s order, unless the judge shall so order.

The salary for the referee shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors.

Upon request of the boards of supervisors of two (2) or more counties, the judge of the chancery court may appoint a suitable person as referee to two (2) or more counties within his district, and the payment of salary may be divided in such ratio as may be agreed upon by the boards of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 6; Laws, 1991, ch. 537, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 43-21-113.
Special judge.

When a judge shall certify in writing that he is unable to serve because of illness or absence from the county or district, the judge may appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 a special judge to serve in his stead. A special judge shall possess all the powers and perform all the duties of the regular judge. The compensation for the special judge shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 on the basis of a statement as to the time and expense incurred by the special judge and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds. In the case of recusal, a judge shall be selected as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 560, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 43-21-115.
Intake unit.

In every youth court division the judge shall appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 one or more persons to function as the intake unit for the youth court division. The youth court intake unit shall perform all duties specified by this chapter. If the person serving as the youth court intake unit is not already a salaried public employee, the salary for such person shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county or municipality, as the case may be, out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-21-117.
Youth court prosecutor.

The youth court prosecutor shall represent the petitioner in all proceedings in the youth court.

The county prosecuting attorney shall serve as the youth court prosecutor; however, if funds are available pursuant to Section 43-21-123, the court may designate, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a prosecutor or prosecutors in lieu of or in addition to the county prosecuting attorney. Where there is a municipal youth court division, the city prosecutor shall serve as youth court prosecutor; provided that the district attorney may participate in transfer proceedings.

The judge may designate as provided in Section 43-21-123 some suitable attorney or attorneys to serve as youth court prosecutor or prosecutors in lieu of or in conjunction with the youth court prosecutor provided in subsection (2) of this section. The designated youth court prosecutor or prosecutors shall be paid a fee or salary fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors, unless the designated youth court prosecutor or prosecutors serves in a municipal youth court division, in which case he shall be paid a fee or salary fixed on order of the judge from the funds available to the municipality.

All youth court prosecutors and county prosecuting attorneys who serve as youth court prosecutors shall be required to receive juvenile justice training approved by the Mississippi Attorney General’s office and regular annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice. The Mississippi Attorney General’s office shall determine the amount of juvenile justice training and annual continuing education which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of youth court prosecutors, shall enforce the provisions of this subsection and shall maintain records on all such youth court prosecutors regarding such training. Should a youth court prosecutor miss two (2) consecutive training sessions sponsored by the Mississippi Attorney General’s office as required by this subsection or fail to attend one (1) such training session within six (6) months of their designation as youth court prosecutor, the youth court prosecutor shall be disqualified to serve and be immediately removed from the office of youth court prosecutor and another youth court prosecutor shall be designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 9; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 367, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 43-21-119.
Youth court personnel.

The judge or his designee shall appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 sufficient personnel, responsible to and under the control of the youth court, to carry on the professional, clerical and other work of the youth court. The cost of these persons appointed by the youth court shall be paid as provided in Section 43-21-123 out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-121.
Guardian ad litem; appointment of a CASA volunteer.

The youth court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child:

When a child has no parent, guardian or custodian;

When the youth court cannot acquire personal jurisdiction over a parent, a guardian or a custodian;

When the parent is a minor or a person of unsound mind;

When the parent is indifferent to the interest of the child or if the interests of the child and the parent, considered in the context of the cause, appear to conflict;

In every case involving an abused or neglected child which results in a judicial proceeding; or

In any other instance where the youth court finds appointment of a guardian ad litem to be in the best interest of the child.

The guardian ad litem shall be appointed by the court when custody is ordered or at the first judicial hearing regarding the case, whichever occurs first.

In addition to all other duties required by law, a guardian ad litem shall have the duty to protect the interest of a child for whom he has been appointed guardian ad litem. The guardian ad litem shall investigate, make recommendations to the court or enter reports as necessary to hold paramount the child’s best interest. The guardian ad litem is not an adversary party and the court shall ensure that guardians ad litem perform their duties properly and in the best interest of their wards. The guardian ad litem shall be a competent person who has no adverse interest to the minor. The court shall ensure that the guardian ad litem is adequately instructed on the proper performance of his duties.

The court, including a county court serving as a youth court, may appoint either a suitable attorney or a suitable layman as guardian ad litem. In cases where the court appoints a layman as guardian ad litem, the court shall also appoint an attorney to represent the child. From and after January 1, 1999, in order to be eligible for an appointment as a guardian ad litem, such attorney or layperson must have received child protection and juvenile justice training provided by or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College within the year immediately preceding such appointment. The Mississippi Judicial College shall determine the amount of child protection and juvenile justice training which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this section. The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of all attorneys and laymen eligible to be appointed as a guardian ad litem under this section and shall enforce the provisions of this subsection.

Upon appointment of a guardian ad litem, the youth court shall continue any pending proceedings for a reasonable time to allow the guardian ad litem to familiarize himself with the matter, consult with counsel and prepare his participation in the cause. The youth court shall issue an order of assignment that grants the guardian ad litem authority to review all relevant documents concerning the minor child and to interview all parties and witnesses involved in proceedings concerning the minor child for whom the guardian ad litem is appointed.

Upon order of the youth court, the guardian ad litem shall be paid a reasonable fee as determined by the youth court judge or referee out of the county general fund as provided under Section 43-21-123. To be eligible for such fee, the guardian ad litem shall submit an accounting of the time spent in performance of his duties to the court.

The court, in its sound discretion, may appoint a volunteer trained layperson to assist children subject to the provisions of this section in addition to the appointment of a guardian ad litem. If the court utilizes his or her discretion as prescribed under this subsection, a volunteer Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) shall be appointed from a program that supervises the volunteer and meets all state and national CASA standards to advocate for the best interests of children in abuse and neglect proceedings. To accomplish the assignment of a CASA volunteer, the court shall issue an order of assignment that shall grant the CASA volunteer the authority, equal to that of the guardian ad litem, to review all relevant documents and to interview all parties and witnesses involved in the proceeding in which he or she is appointed. Except as otherwise ordered by the court, the assignment of a CASA volunteer for a child shall include subsequent proceedings through permanent placement of the child.

Before assigning a CASA volunteer as prescribed under this subsection, the youth court judge shall determine if the volunteer has sufficient qualifications, training and ability to serve as a CASA volunteer, including his or her ability to represent and advocate for the best interests of children assigned to him or her. No volunteer shall be assigned until a comprehensive criminal background check has been conducted.

All CASA volunteers shall:

Be sworn in by a judge of the court;

Swear or affirm to abide by all laws, regulations, and orders of the court;

Swear or affirm to advocate what he or she perceives to be in the best interests of the child for whom he or she is assigned in all matters pending before the court;

Provide independent, factual information to the court regarding the children and cases to which they are assigned;

Advocate on behalf of the children involved in the cases to which they are assigned what they perceive to be in the best interests of the children; and

Monitor proceedings in cases to which they have been assigned and advise and assist the court in its determination of the best interests of the children involved.

Regarding any case to which a CASA volunteer has been assigned, the CASA volunteer:

Shall be notified by the court of all court proceedings and hearings of any kind pertaining to the child;

Shall be notified by the Department of Child Protection Services of all administrative review hearings;

Shall be entitled to attend all court proceedings and hearings of any kind pertaining to the child;

May be called as a witness in the proceedings by any party or by the court and may request of the court the opportunity to appear as a witness; and

Shall be given access to all portions of the court record relating to proceedings pertaining to the child and the child’s family.

Upon application to the court and notice to all parties, the court shall grant the CASA volunteer access to other information, including the department records as provided in Section 43-21-261, relating to the child and the child’s family and to other matters involved in the proceeding in which he or she is appointed. All records and information requested or reviewed by the CASA volunteer in the course of his or her assignment shall be deemed confidential and shall not be disclosed by him except pursuant to court order. All records and information shall only be disclosed as directed by court order and shall be disclosed as directed by court order and shall be subject to whatever protective order the court deems appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 11; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 367, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 9; Laws, 1999, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 420, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-123.
Expenditures by the youth court.

Except for expenses provided by state funds and/or other monies, the board of supervisors, or the municipal governing board where there is a municipal youth court, shall adequately provide funds for the operation of the youth court division of the chancery court in conjunction with the regular chancery court budget, or the county or family courts where said courts are constituted. In preparation for said funding, on an annual basis at the time requested, the youth court judge or administrator shall prepare and submit to the board of supervisors, or the municipal governing board of the youth court wherever the youth court is a municipal court, an annual budget which will identify the number, staff position, title and amount of annual or monthly compensation of each position as well as provide for other expenditures necessary to the functioning and operation of the youth court. When the budget of the youth court or youth court judge is approved by the board of supervisors or the governing authority of the municipality, then the youth court or youth court judge may employ such persons as provided in the budget from time to time.

The board of supervisors of any county in which there is located a youth court, and the governing authority of any municipality in which there is located a municipal youth court, are each authorized to reimburse the youth court judges and other youth court employees or personnel for reasonable travel and expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and in attending educational meetings offering professional training to such persons as budgeted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 12; Laws, 1989, ch. 441, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-21-125.
Council of youth court judges.

There shall be a Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges which shall be the official organization of the judges having youth court jurisdiction in this state. The membership of the council shall consist of all the judges and referees of youth courts in the State of Mississippi.

The Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend such rules, regulations or bylaws as it considers necessary to the conduct of its affairs.

The council may elect officers and provide for such meetings of the council as it deems necessary. The council shall meet at least annually for the consideration of:

any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members; and

problems that have arisen in connection with the operation of the youth courts in any county or in all counties in order to improve the administration of juvenile justice in the state.

The council shall publish and submit to the governor, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the Mississippi Judicial Council an annual report of the operations which shall include financial and statistical data and may include suggestions and recommendations for legislation.

The council is authorized to receive and expend any funds which may become available from the federal government to carry out any of the purposes of this chapter, and to this end the council may meet any federal requirements not contrary to state law which may be conditions precedent to receiving such federal funds.

The council may cooperate with the federal government in a program for training personnel employed or preparing for employment by the youth court and may receive and expend funds from federal or state sources or from private donations for such purposes. The council may contract with public or nonprofit institutions of higher learning for the training of such personnel, may conduct short-term training courses of its own, may hire experts on a temporary basis for such purpose and may cooperate with the department of youth services or other state departments or agencies in personnel training programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-127.
Cooperation.

It is hereby made the duty of every public official or department to render all assistance and cooperation within his or its jurisdictional power which may further the objects of this chapter. The youth court is authorized to seek the cooperation of all societies, organizations or agencies having for their object the protection or aid of children.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1979.